Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-606
Contribution by state employees; collection.

The contribution imposed by section 68-605 shall be collected by deducting the amount of the contribution from wages as and when paid, but failure to make such deduction shall not relieve the employee from liability for such contribution.

Laws 1951, c. 297, § 4(2), p. 981.